Rhode Island, session 2025, SB57.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-7-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-7 entitled "Sidewalks" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
24-7-8. Sidewalks along state highways.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be held to oust the state of jurisdiction over any such
sidewalks and curbing as may be made, laid, or constructed upon state highways within a town, but
no sidewalks or curbing on state highways shall be made, laid, or constructed without the approval
of the director of transportation first being had and obtained as to the feasibility, location, type, and
time of construction.
(b) All maintenance of sidewalks along state highways shall be the responsibility of the
state with the exception of snow and ice removal on those sidewalks.
SECTION 2. Section 24-8-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-8 entitled "Construction
and Maintenance of State Roads" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-8-6. Authority for sidewalks and curbs.
(a) The director of transportation shall have the power and authority to make, lay in and
upon, and construct sidewalks, including curbs, adjacent to and along either or any one side or both
sides of any state road, now constructed, in the process of construction, or to be constructed, which
in his or her opinion and judgment require sidewalks and curbs for pedestrian travel.
(b) All maintenance of sidewalks along state highways shall be the responsibility of the
state with the exception of snow and ice removal on those sidewalks.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000393
========
LC000393 - Page 2 of 3